Utah statutes.
62A-1-108.   Executive director -- Appointment -- Compensation -- Qualifications -- Responsibilities.

(1)  The chief administrative officer of the department is the executive director, who shall be appointed by the governor with the consent of the Senate.  The executive director may be removed at the will of the governor.  The executive director shall receive a salary established by the governor within the salary range fixed by the Legislature in Title 67, Chapter 22, State Officer Compensation.  The executive director shall be experienced in administration, management, and coordination of complex organizations.

(2)  The executive director is responsible for:

(a)  administration and supervision of the department;

(b)  coordination of policies and program activities conducted through the boards, divisions, and offices of the department;

(c)  approval of the proposed budget of each board, division, and office within the department; and

(d)  such other duties as the Legislature or governor shall assign to him.

(3)  The executive director may appoint deputy or assistant directors to assist him in carrying out the department's responsibilities.

